dictsource/hu_rules
.group ü
        ü          y
        ütt        yt:
        ütty       yc:
        ütty (L01  yc
        üttyb      ycb       //special exception with always need executing
        üttyr      ycR2      //special exception with always need executind
        ütt (L01   yt
        üttb       ytb       //special exception with always need executing
        üttr       ytR2      //special exception with always need executing


.group ű
        ű          y:
     t) ű (zijáték y
    _t) ű (nés     y         //If this word is a single word, need [y] not [y:]. eg. "tűnés" but not "eltűnés"
    _t) ű (njön    y

.group v
        v          v
     _) v (_       ve:
?1   _) versailles vER2sa:j

.group w
        w          v

.group x
     _) x (_       iks
        x          ks

.group y
     _) y          j
        y          i
     K) y (K       i
        yard       jAR2d
        yardd      jAR2d:

.group z
        z          z
        zz (b      z         //if have two z and b letter, need one [z]
        zz (t      z         //if have two z and t letter, need one [z]
        zz (v      z

        zs         Z
        zzs        Z:
     a) z (t       s
     a) z (tán     s
befeje) z (te      s
    bi) z (tons    s
    bi) z (tos     s
csontvá) z         z
     e) z (t       s
    ho) z (ta      s
    ho) z (tá      s
 helye) z (ked     s
  inté) z (ked     s
 költö) z (köd     s
lefeje) z (te      s
lefeje) z (ték     s
   pén) z (tár     s
    ré) z (serpenyő z
 tartó) z (t       s
    gá) z (cső     z
    ké) z (sz      z
    há) z (so      z
    má) zc (sz     z
    mé) zc (sz     z
  nehé) z (sé      S
  nehé) z (súlyú   z
   iga) zs (ág     SS
    ga) zs (ág     SS
   pén) z          z
   tor) z (ság     z
 _vité) z          z
   _ví) z (s       z
    ga) zs (ág     zS
   _gá) zsz (ámla  zs
   _gá) zsz (ámlá  zs
   _ré) zs (ó      zS
     ő) zs (uta    zS
   _vá) zs (or     zS
_szára) zs (ág     SS
 _nehé) zs (ely    zS
     _) zürich     tsyR2i    C
    tí) zsz (er    s:
   szá) zsz (or    s:
    mé) z (sör     z
  leme) z (szerz   z
    ké) z (zsibbadás z
    ké) z (sérül   z
   szű) z (sült    z
    gő) z (sugár   z
találko) z (t      s
 eszkö) z (sor     z
    gő) z (síp     z
 matró) z (sapk    z
  nehé) z (súly    z
   tör) zsz (ászló Z|z
        zsz        z|s       //general exception. Need difference first z and second sz phoneme. eg: rajzszög, rajzszeg, mézszín words.
   pén) z (t       s
 rende) z (ked     s
 kocká) z (ta      s
  hibá) z (tat     s
különbö) z (tet    s
 válto) z (tat     s
 válto) z (tass    s
tájéko) z (tat     s
tájéko) z (tass    s
    bi) z (tat     s
    rá) z (kód     s
    ré) z (síp     z
  gará) zs (tároló S
  dará) zs (fészek S
    ri) zs (t      S
    tű) zsz (erész s:
    tű) zsz (eréssz s:
 búcsú) z (ko      s
nyújtó) z (ko      s
     ő) z (sörét   z
szedelő) z (kö     s
alkalma) z (ko     s
  egye) z (ke      s
  egye) z (te      s
    há) z (tartás  s
 dolgo) z (t       s
  öltö) z (te      s
  inté) z (t       s
    ke) z (dt      s
  dobo) z (t       s
határo) z (t       s
  öltö) z (kö      s
   oko) z (t       s
    ví) zsz (intes s:
szemkö) z (t       s
    ví) z (szint   s
vonatko) z (ta     s
idegkö) z (pon     s
tisztá) z (t       s
csatlako) z (ta    s
  üldö) z (t       s
hiányo) z (t       s
  kobo) z (t       s
foglalko) z (t     s
tanulmányo) z (t   s
magyará) z (t      s
  kötö) z (t       s
vitatko) z (t      s
 tartó) z (k       s
ajándéko) z (t     s
 tarto) z (k       s
 tarto) z (t       s
 rejtő) z (kö      s
 rejtő) z (t       s
 hango) z (t       s
szerve) z (ked     s
  kaló) z (ság     z
szellő) z (tet     s
 vigyá) zz (áll    z
        zippzár    tsipza:R2
        zipzár     tsipza:R2
   győ) z (köd     s
   győ) z (t       s
  kötö) z (kö      s
  árví) z (súj     z         //for example árvízsújtott word need spokening single z phoneme, not Z phoneme
magyará) z (kod    s
 kalau) z (ság     z
  pofo) z (kod     s
  ezkö) z (sáv     z
 eszkö) z (sáv     z
   _mé) z (sárg    z
    tű) z (sáv     z
   _tí) z (sor     z
  _szá) z (sor     z
    ré) z (sisak   z
 matró) z (zsák    z
    ré) z (sodrony z
    há) z (sarkot  z
    há) z (sarok   z
    ro) zszs (em   Z:
   _gő) z (süvölt  z
  ezkö) z (sor     z
   wal) z (er      ts
tanácskö) z (társaság s

.group
        $          dolla:R2
        ä          E
        æ          E
        ß          s
        ç          tS
        ñ          n^
        ø          Y
